sl-SI: Konfiguracija stojnice: Klop; Kotna; Dvostranska; Modularna sekcijska; Enostranska; V obliki črke U; V obliki črke V; Stenska; Drugo
ko: 부스 구성: 뱅큇; 코너형; 양면형; 모듈형 섹셔널; 단면형; U자형; V자형; 벽걸이형; 기타
es: Configuración de la cabina: Banqueta; Esquina; Doble cara; Seccional modular; Una cara; En forma de U; En forma de V; Montado en la pared; Otro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia búdky: Banket; Rohová; Obojstranná; Modulárna sekciová; Jednostranná; V tvare U; V tvare V; Nástenná; Iná
ru: Конфигурация кабинки: Банкетка; Угловая; Двусторонняя; Модульная секционная; Односторонняя; П-образная; V-образная; Навесная; Другое
hr-HR: Konfiguracija separea: Klupa; Kutna; Dvostrana; Modularna sekcijska; Jednostrana; U obliku slova U; V-oblika; Zidna; Ostalo
th: การจัดวางบูธ: บังเกตต์; เข้ามุม; สองด้าน; โมดูลาร์แบบแยกส่วน; ด้านเดียว; รูปตัวยู; รูปตัววี; ติดผนัง; อื่นๆ
nl: Booth-opstelling: Zitbank; Hoek; Dubbelzijdig; Modulair uit componenten; Enkelzijdig; U-vormig; V-vormig; Wandmontage; Overige
nb: Konfigurasjon for bås: Bankett; Hjørne; Dobbeltsidig; Modulær seksjon; Enkeltsidig; U-formet; V-formet; Veggmontert; Annet
zh-CN: 展位配置: 靠墙长椅; 转角; 双面; 模块化拼接; 单面; U 形; V 形; 壁挂式; 其他
fi: Kopin kokoonpano: Panketti; Kulma; Kaksipuolinen; Modulaarinen osio; Yksipuolinen; U-muotoinen; V-muotoinen; Seinään kiinnitettävä; Muu
sv: Båskonfiguration: Bankett; Hörn; Dubbelsidig; Modulär sektion; Enkelsidig; U-formad; V-formad; Väggmonterad; Annan
de: Kabinenkonfiguration: Sitzbank; Ecke; Doppelseitig; Modular; Einseitig; U-förmig; V-förmig; Wandmontage; Sonstige
pt-BR: Configuração do estande: Banqueta; Canto; De dois lados; Seccional modular; De um lado só; Em forma de U; Em forma de V; Montado na parede; Outros
cs: Uspořádání stánku: Banketové sezení; Rohové; Oboustranné; Modulární; Jednostranné; Ve tvaru U; Ve tvaru V; Nástěnné; Jiné
vi: Cấu hình gian hàng: Ghế dài sát tường; Góc; Hai mặt; Ghế ghép (Modular); Một mặt; Hình chữ U; Hình chữ V; Gắn tường; Khác
ja: ブース構造: バンケット; コーナー; 両面; モジュラーセクショナル; 片面; U字型; V字型; 壁掛け式; その他
en: Booth configuration: Banquette; Corner; Double-sided; Modular sectional; Single-sided; U-shaped; V-shaped; Wall-mounted; Other
el: Διαμόρφωση θαλάμου: Καναπές; Γωνιακό; Διπλής όψης; Σπονδυλωτό τμηματικό; Μονής όψης; Σε σχήμα U; Σε σχήμα V; Επίτοιχο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Configurația cabinei: Banchetă; Colț; Cu două fețe; Secțional modular; Cu o față; În formă de U; În formă de V; Montat pe perete; Altele
lt-LT: Stalo ir suolų komplektų konfigūracija: Banketinė; Kampinė; Dvipusė; Modulinė segmentinė; Vienpusė; U formos; V formos; Tvirtinama prie sienos; Kita
bg-BG: Конфигурация на кабината: Банкет; Ъглова; Двустранна; Модулна секционна; Едностранна; U-образна; V-образна; Стенна; Друго
tr: Loca düzeni: Sedir; Köşe; Çift taraflı; Modüler parçalı; Tek taraflı; U şeklinde; V şeklinde; Duvara monte; Diğer
zh-TW: 攤位配置: 靠牆長椅; 轉角; 雙面; 模組化組合座; 單面; U 型; V 型; 壁掛; 其他
it: Configurazione della cabina: Panca; Ad angolo; A due lati; Componibile modulare; A un lato; A forma di U; A forma di V; A parete; Altro
pt-PT: Configuração do stand: Banqueta; Canto; Dupla face; Seccional modular; Face única; Em forma de U; Em forma de V; Montagem na parede; Outro
pl: Konfiguracja kabiny: Bankietowa; Narożna; Dwustronna; Modułowa (sekcyjna); Jednostronna; W kształcie litery U; W kształcie litery V; Naścienna; Inne
fr: Configuration du stand: Banquette; D'angle; Double face; Modulaire composable; Simple face; En U; En V; Mural; Autre
hu: Stand konfiguráció: Pad; Sarok; Kétoldalas; Moduláris szekcionált; Egyoldalas; U alakú; V alakú; Falra szerelt; Egyéb
da: Konfiguration af bås: Bænksæde; Hjørne; Dobbeltsidet; Modulær sektion; Enkeltsidet; U-formet; V-formet; Vægmonteret; Andet